South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3777.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-15-45 (A) and (C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) It is unlawful for a manufacturer or franchisor or any parent, affiliate, wholly or partially owned subsidiary, officer, or representative of a manufacturer or franchisor to own, operate, or control or to participate in the ownership, operation, or control of a new motor vehicle dealer in this State, to establish in this State an additional dealer or dealership in which that person or entity has an interest, or to own, operate, or control, directly or indirectly, an interest in a dealer or dealership in this State, excluding a passive interest in a publicly traded corporation held for investment purposes. This subsection does not prohibit the ownership, operation, or control of a new motor vehicle dealer by a manufacturer or franchisor: (1) for a temporary period, not to exceed one year, during the transition from one owner or operator to another, except that on a showing by a manufacturer or franchisor of good cause, a court of competent jurisdiction may extend this time limit for periods up to an additional twelve months; (2) during a period in which the new motor vehicle dealer is being sold pursuant to a bona fide contract, shareholder agreement, or purchase option to the operator of the dealership;  or (3) at the same location at which the manufacturer or franchisor has been continuously engaged in the retail sale of new motor vehicles as the owner, operator, or controller of the dealership since January 1, 1998.; or (4) that owns or operates a manufacturing factory or assembly plant, provided that the manufacturer or franchisor: (a) manufactures or assembles vehicles propelled wholly or in part by an electric motor; (b) has had no franchised dealers in this State in the ten-year period before this item became effective; and (c) was incorporated in the United States before the effective date of this act. (C) It is unlawful for a manufacturer or franchisor or any parent, affiliate, wholly or partially owned subsidiary, officer, or representative of a manufacturer or franchisor to own a facility that engages primarily in the repair of motor vehicles, except motor homes, if the repairs are performed pursuant to the terms of a franchise or other agreement or the repairs are performed as part of a manufacturer's or franchisor's warranty, unless the facility is owned or operated by a manufacturer or any affiliate, or wholly or partially owned subsidiary, of a manufacturer described in subsection (A)(4). Nothing in this subsection prohibits a manufacturer or franchisor or any parent, affiliate, wholly or partially owned subsidiary, officer, or representative of a manufacturer or franchisor from owning a facility to perform warranty or other repairs on motor vehicles owned and operated by the manufacturer or franchisor or any parent, affiliate, wholly or partially owned subsidiary, officer, or representative of a manufacturer or franchisor. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----